Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.400

Conformance required to order prohibiting the use of any filing.

Whenever the director prohibits by order or otherwise the use of any filing under this chapter, the form and contents of any filing used thereafter shall conform to the requirements of the order.

[ 1994 c 92 s 390; 1981 c 85 s 79.]